Nevada, session 83, AB546.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 482.503 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.503 The registration fee imposed by this chapter does not
apply to vehicles owned by [the] :
1. The United States [, the] ;
2. The State of Nevada, [any] including, without limitation, a
charter school;
3. Any political subdivision of the State of Nevada ; [,] or [any]
4. Any county, municipal corporation, city, unincorporated
town or school district in the State of Nevada.
-
*AB546*

– 2 –
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB546*